District of Columbia statutes.
25-910

Judicial review of tax determination or denial of refund claim.

A person aggrieved by a final determination of tax or by a denial of a claim for refund (other than a refund of tax finally determined in § 25-909) may, within 6 months from the date of assessment of the deficiency or from the date of the denial of a claim for refund, appeal to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the same manner and to the same extent as set forth in §§ 47-3303, 47-3304, 47-3306, 47-3307, and 47-3308.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 319, § 45
as added July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131,§ 303, 29 DCR 2418
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-910.